Washington statutes.
RCW 39.84.050

Public corporations—Directors—Conflicts of interest.

It shall be illegal for a director, officer, agent, or employee of a public corporation to have, directly or indirectly, any financial interest in any property to be included in or any contract for property, services, or materials to be furnished or used in connection with any industrial development facility financed through the public corporation. Violation of any provision of this section is a gross misdemeanor.

[ 1981 c 300 s 5.]